Utah statutes.
17-41-404.   Policy of state agencies.

Each state agency shall encourage the continuity, development, and viability of agriculture within agriculture protection areas and industrial uses with industrial protection areas by:

(1)  not enacting rules that would impose unreasonable restrictions on farm structures or farm practices within the agriculture protection area or on industrial uses and practices within the industrial protection area unless those laws, ordinances, or regulations bear a direct relationship to public health or safety or are required by federal law; and

(2)  modifying existing rules that would impose unreasonable restrictions on farm structures or farm practices within the agriculture protection area or on industrial uses and activities within the industrial protection area unless those laws, ordinances, or regulations bear a direct relationship to public health or safety or are required by federal law.

